Utah statutes.
62A-6-105.   Persons who may give informed consent.

For purposes of this chapter, the following persons may give informed consent to sterilization:

(1)  a person who is the subject of sterilization, if he is capable of giving informed consent; and

(2)  a person appointed by the court to give informed consent on behalf of a subject of sterilization who is incapable of giving informed consent.

